Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-317 Reports; monitoring of
guardianship. (a) Within thirty days after appointment, a guardian shall
report to the court in writing on the condition of the ward and account for
money and other assets in the guardian's possession or subject to the
guardian's control. A guardian shall report at least annually thereafter and
whenever ordered by the court. The report shall state or contain:

(1) The current mental, physical, and social
condition of the ward;

(2) The living arrangements for all addresses of the
ward during the reporting period;

(3) The medical, educational, vocational, and other
services provided to the ward and the guardian's opinion as to the adequacy of
the ward's care;

(4) A summary of the guardian's visits with the ward
and activities on the ward's behalf and the extent to which the ward has
participated in decision-making;

(5) If the ward is institutionalized, whether the
guardian considers the current plan for care, treatment, or habilitation to be
in the ward's best interest;

(6) Plans for future care; and

(7) A recommendation as to the need for continued
guardianship and any recommended changes in the scope of the guardianship.

(b) The court may appoint a kokua kanawai to
review a report, interview the ward or guardian, and make any other
investigation the court directs.

(c) The court shall establish a system for
monitoring guardianships, including the filing and review of annual reports. [L
2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next